New York, session 2025-2026, A3995.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "unfore- 2 seen circumstances act". 3 § 2. Section 5 of article 1-A of chapter 784 of the laws of 1951 4 constituting the New York state defense emergency act, as amended by 5 chapter 420 of the laws of 1968, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 5. Persons eligible to succeed governor. If, as a result of an 7 attack or a natural or peacetime disaster, the office of governor 8 becomes vacant and each of the lieutenant governor, the temporary presi- 9 dent of the senate and the speaker of the assembly is unable to 10 discharge the powers and duties of the office of governor or is absent 11 from the state, then the officer of the state who is (a) highest in 12 order of the following list, (b) not otherwise unable to discharge such 13 powers and duties, and (c) not absent from the state, shall act as 14 governor: attorney general, comptroller, commissioner of transporta- 15 tion, commissioner of health, commissioner of [commerce] economic devel- 16 opment, [industrial] commissioner of labor, [chairman] chairperson of 17 the public service commission, [secertary] secretary of state. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04313-01-5